tools/nvda/louis/tables/ms-my-g2.ctb
#Lah Sign (156)
begword lahi =
midword lahi =
endword lahi 156-24
endword lahian 156-24-12456
endword lahikah 156-24-126
endword lahikan 156-24-345
endword lahiku 156-24-13-136
endword lahikukah 156-24-13-136-126
endword lahikulah 156-24-13-136-156
endword lahilah 156-24-156
endword lahimu 156-24-134-136
endword lahimukah 156-24-134-136-126
endword lahimulah 156-24-134-136-156
endword lahinya 156-24-246-1
endword lahinyakah 156-24-246-1-126
endword lahinyalah 156-24-246-1-156
begmidword lahin 123-1-125-35
begmidword lahing 123-1-125-24-346
begmidword laho =
begmidword lahong 123-1-125-135-346
always lahu =
begmidword lahung 123-1-125-136-346

#Ny Sign (246)
endword kanya 13-1-246-1
endword kanyakah 13-1-246-1-126
endword kanyalah 13-1-246-1-156

#Per Sign (356)
endword per 1256-1235
endword peran 1256-1235-12456
endword perankah 1256-1235-12456-126
endword perankan 1256-1235-12456-345
endword peranku 1256-1235-12456-13-136
endword perankukah 1256-1235-12456-13-136-126
endword perankulah 1256-1235-12456-13-136-156
endword peranlah 1256-1235-12456-156
endword peranmu 1256-1235-12456-134-136
endword peranmukah 1256-1235-12456-134-136-126
endword peranmulah 1256-1235-12456-134-136-156
endword perannya 1256-1235-12456-246-1
endword perannyakah 1256-1235-246-1-126
endword perannyalah 1256-1235-12456-246-1-156

#BegMidWord of Word
begmidword ahang 1-125-1-346
begmidword ahe =
begmidword ahen 1-125-26
begmidword aheng 1-125-15-346
begmidword ahing 1-125-24-346
begmidword aho =

#End Of Word Suffixes
endword amanan 2346-12456-12456
endword amanankah 2346-12456-12456-126
endword amananku 2346-12456-12456-13-136
endword amananlah 2346-12456-12456-156
endword amanannya 2346-12456-12456-246-1
endword amankah 2346-12456-126
endword amanku 2346-12456-13-136
endword amankukah 2346-12456-13-136-126
endword amankulah 2346-12456-13-136-156
endword amankan 2346-12456-345
endword amankankah 2346-12456-345-126
endword amankanku 2346-12456-345-13-136
endword amankanlah 2346-12456-345-156
endword amankanmu 2346-12456-345-134-136
endword amankannya 2346-12456-345-246-1
endword amanku 2346-12456-13-136
endword amankukah 2346-12456-13-136-126
endword amankulah 2346-12456-13-136-156
endword amanlah 2346-12456-156
endword amanmu 2346-12456-134-136
endword amanmukah 2346-12456-134-136-126
endword amanmulah 2346-12456-134-136-156
endword amannya 2346-12456-246-1
endword amannyakah 2346-12456-246-1-126
endword amannyalah 2346-12456-246-1-156
endword annya 12456-246-1
endword dian 145-24-12456
endword diankah 145-24-12456-126
endword diankan 145-24-12456-345
endword dianku 145-24-12456-13-136 
endword diankukah 145-24-12456-13-136-126
endword diankulah 145-24-12456-13-136-156
endword dianlah 145-24-12456-156
endword dianmu 145-24-12456-134-136
endword dianmukah 145-24-12456-134-136-126
endword dianmulah 145-24-12456-134-136-156
endword diannya 145-24-12456-246-1
endword diannyakah 145-24-12456-246-1-126
endword diannyalah 145-24-12456-246-1-156
endword dikah 145-24-126
endword diku 145-24-13-136
endword dikukah 145-24-13-136-126
endword dikulah 145-24-13-136-156
endword dilah 145-24-156
endword dimu 145-24-134-136
endword dimukah 145-24-134-136-126
endword dimulah 145-24-134-136-156
endword dinya 145-24-246-1
endword dinyakah 145-24-246-1-126
endword dinyalah 145-24-246-1-156
endword kah 126
midendword kahan 126-12456
endword kahi 126-24
endword kahkan 126-345
endword kahku 126-13-136
endword kahlah 126-156
endword kahmu 126-134-136
endword kahnya 126-246-1
endword kahiku 126-24-13-136
endword kahilah 126-24-156
endword kahimu 126-24-134-136
endword kahinya 126-24-246-1
endword ku =
endword kukah 13-136-126
endword kulah 13-136-156
endword lah 156
midendword mahan 134-1246-12456
endword mu =
endword mukah 134-136-126
endword mulah 134-136-156
endword nya 246-1
endword nyakah 246-1-126
endword nyalah 246-1-156
